Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 13. Commercial Charter Fisheries Revolving Loan Fund.

Sec. 16.10.801.
Commercial charter fisheries revolving loan fund.

The commercial charter fisheries revolving loan fund is created in the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development to carry out the purposes of AS

16.10.801

—

16.10.840

.

The commercial charter fisheries revolving loan fund consists of the following:

money appropriated to, transferred to, or received by gift, grant, devise, bequest, or donation to the fund;

principal and interest payments or other income earned on loans or investments of the fund;

money chargeable to principal or interest that is collected through liquidation by foreclosure or other process on loans made under AS

16.10.801

—

16.10.840

.

Money in the fund may be used by the legislature to make appropriations for costs of administering AS

16.10.801

—

16.10.840

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 58 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2012, in this section, “AS

16.10.840

” was substituted for “AS

16.10.890

” to reflect the 2012 renumbering of AS

16.10.890

.

Sec. 16.10.805.
Powers and duties of the department.

The department may

make loans to eligible applicants under AS

16.10.801

—

16.10.840

for the purchase of charter halibut permits;

to refinance debt obligations made by other lenders more than 12 months before the department received the loan application and incurred by an applicant for the purchase of charter halibut fishing vessels or gear if the applicant otherwise qualifies for a loan under AS

16.10.801

—

16.10.840

; the department may collect a refinancing loan origination charge as provided by regulation;

receive, take, hold, and administer any appropriation, transfer, gift, grant, bequest, devise, or donation of money for the fund;

establish amortization plans for repayment of loans, including extensions of the terms of loans;

allow an assumption of a loan if

the applicant meets the requirements established under this section; and

approval of the assumption would be consistent with the purposes of AS

16.10.801

—

16.10.840

;

establish the rate of interest for loans consistent with law;

charge and collect fees for services provided under AS

16.10.801

—

16.10.840

;

adopt regulations under AS 44.62 necessary to carry out the provisions of AS

16.10.801

—

16.10.840

, including regulations to establish reasonable fees for services provided; and

designate agents and delegate powers as necessary to the agents.

History.

(§ 12 ch 58 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2012, in this section, “AS

16.10.840

” was substituted for “AS

16.10.890

” to reflect the 2012 renumbering of AS

16.10.890

.

Sec. 16.10.810.
Eligibility.

For an applicant to be eligible for a loan under AS

16.10.801

—

16.10.840

, the applicant shall be a resident of the state, as determined under (c) of this section, and shall

qualify for the purchase of a charter halibut permit under applicable law; or

qualify as a transferee for a charter halibut permit under applicable law.

In addition to the requirements set out in (a) of this section, the applicant must provide to the department a document from a state financial institution stating that

the applicant has been denied a loan for the same purpose; or

a loan from the financial institution is contingent on the applicant also receiving a loan from the fund.

To meet the residency requirements of (a) of this section, the applicant

shall physically reside in this state and maintain a domicile in this state during the 24 consecutive months preceding the date of application for the program; and

may not have

declared or established residency in another state; or

received residency or a benefit based on residency from another state.

History.

(§ 12 ch 58 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2012, in this section, “AS

16.10.840

” was substituted for “AS

16.10.890

” to reflect the 2012 renumbering of AS

16.10.890

.

Sec. 16.10.815.
Limitations on loans.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a loan under AS

16.10.801

—

16.10.840

for a charter halibut permit may not exceed the permit value determined by a 12-month rolling average set quarterly by the department for like permits;

for a loan other than a loan for a charter halibut permit may not exceed $100,000 a year;

may not exceed a term of 15 years, except for extensions under AS

16.10.805

;

may not bear interest at a rate greater than the prime rate, as defined in AS

44.88.599

, plus two percentage points, but which may not be less than six percent a year or more than 10 1/2 percent a year;

must be secured by a first priority lien on collateral acceptable to the commissioner, which may include collateral other than a charter halibut permit; and

may not be made to a person who has a past due child support obligation established by court order or by the child support services agency under AS

25.27.160

—

25.27.220

at the time of application.

The total balances outstanding on loans made to a borrower under AS

16.10.805

may not exceed $200,000.

History.

(§ 12 ch 58 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2012, in this section, “AS

16.10.840

” was substituted for “AS

16.10.890

” to reflect the 2012 renumbering of AS

16.10.890

.

Sec. 16.10.820.
Default.

If the borrower defaults on a note, the department shall notify the borrower of the default and the consequences of default by mailing a notice to the borrower’s most recent address provided to the department by the borrower or obtained by the department.

History.

(§ 12 ch 58 SLA 2012)

Effective dates. —

Section 17, ch. 58, SLA 2012, SLA 2012 makes this section effective June 7, 2012, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 16.10.825.
Special account established.

The foreclosure expense account is established as a special account within the commercial charter fisheries revolving loan fund.

The department may expend money credited to the foreclosure expense account when necessary to protect the state’s security interest in collateral on loans granted under AS

16.10.815

or to defray expenses incurred during foreclosure proceedings after an obligor defaults.

History.

(§ 12 ch 58 SLA 2012)

Effective dates. —

Section 17, ch. 58, SLA 2012, SLA 2012 makes this section effective June 7, 2012, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 16.10.830.
Disposal of property acquired after default.

The department shall dispose of property acquired through default of a loan made under AS

16.10.801

—

16.10.840

. Disposal must be made in a manner that serves the best interest of the state and may include the amortization of payments over a period of years.

History.

(§ 12 ch 58 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2012, in this section, “AS

16.10.840

” was substituted for “AS

16.10.890

” to reflect the 2012 renumbering of AS

16.10.890

.

Sec. 16.10.835.
Waiver of confidentiality.

The commissioner may release information about the borrower’s loan to any individual if release of the information has been authorized by the borrower.

History.

(§ 12 ch 58 SLA 2012)

Sec. 16.10.840.
Definitions.

In AS

16.10.801

—

16.10.840

,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

History.

(§ 12 ch 58 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

16.10.890

and renumbered in 2012, at which time an internal reference to this section was also conformed.